Hawaii statutes.
§334-131 Notice of intent to discharge.
[Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] (a)
When the treating psychiatrist contemplates discharge for a subject of the
order because of expiration of the court order or because the subject of the
order is no longer a proper subject for assisted community treatment, as
determined by the criteria in section 334-121, the treating psychiatrist shall
provide notice of intent to discharge.

(b) The notice shall be filed with the family
court which issued the order for assisted community treatment, and served by
personal service or by certified mail on those persons whom the order for
assisted community treatment specifies as entitled to receive notice.

(c) The notice of intent to discharge shall be
mailed at least ten days prior to the intended date of discharge.

(d) If no objection is filed under section
334-132 prior to the intended date of discharge, the subject of the order is
thereupon fully discharged from assisted community treatment. [L 1984, c 251,
pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §17]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next